California statutes. Education Code
81949.

The board may construct any project and acquire all property necessary therefor on such terms and conditions as it may deem advisable. When any part of the work is to be done or performed by any public body or by the United States jointly or in conjunction with the board, the portion of the cost thereof to be borne by the board may be turned over to the government of the United States or to any other public body to be expended by it in the acquisition, construction, or completion of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81950.

Title to all property acquired by the board and the revenues and income therefrom is in the community college district. The title to any moneys, revenues, sinking funds, reserve funds, and other funds created by this chapter and the income thereof pledged to the payment of the principal or interest or any bonds issued thereunder is subject to trusts declared in favor of the bondholders. All such property, and the income therefrom, are exempt from all taxation by the State of California or by any county, city and county, city, district, political subdivision, or public corporation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81951.

At all times the operation, maintenance, control, repair, construction, reconstruction, alteration, and improvement of any project are vested in the board subject to authorized leases permitted by any indenture. The board shall comply with all applicable county and city zoning, building, and health regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81952.

The board may use for the payment of the costs of acquisition, construction, or completion of any project, any funds made available to the board by the State of California or any other funds provided by the board from any source, to be expended for the accomplishing of the purposes set forth in this chapter, together with the proceeds of revenue bonds issued and sold by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81955.

When authorized by resolution of the board, as provided in this chapter, the county treasurer shall prepare and procure the printing or engrossing of bonds, coupons, indenture, or other instruments and contracts or agreements of every kind required or convenient for or pertaining to the issuance or sale of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81956.

The board shall fix rents, charges, and fees for all projects acquired, constructed, or completed under the terms of this chapter for the use thereof by any persons utilizing the facilities thereof, subject to such contractural obligations as may be entered into by the board and the holders of bonds issued under this chapter. The board is authorized to change rents, charges, and fees from time to time, as conditions warrant. All rents, charges, and fees shall at all times be fixed to yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and maintenance expenses, including repairs and insurance costs and all redemption payments and interest charges and reserve fund requirements on revenue bonds at any time issued and outstanding hereunder, as the same become due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81960.

The holder of any bond issued pursuant to this chapter may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require and compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon the board or upon any official or employee or assumed by any thereof, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, or insurance of any project, or the collection, deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of rents, rates, charges, fees, and all other revenues derived from the operation and use of any project or in connection with the deposit, investment, and disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of bonds under this chapter. The enumeration of such rights and remedies do not, however, exclude the exercise or prosecution of any other rights or remedies available to the holders of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81961.

The proceeds from the sale of all bonds authorized under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited forthwith by the county treasurer, on order of the county auditor, in the county treasury to the credit of a construction fund as designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in each county treasury for each district in the county issuing bonds pursuant to this chapter. The money in such construction fund shall be expended, pursuant to claims filed by the board with the county auditor, for the purposes authorized by this chapter, or as provided in the indenture, and for such other purposes, subject to the restrictions provided by law or by the indenture, as may be authorized by resolution of the board. Moneys required to meet the costs of acquisition or construction and all expenses and costs incidental to the acquisition, construction, furnishing, and equipping of any project authorized by this chapter shall be paid from the construction fund as herein provided upon claim filed by the board and after audit by the county auditor in the manner provided by law and upon warrants drawn by the county auditor.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81962.

All revenues received from the operation of any project acquired or constructed by the board under the provisions of this chapter shall be transmitted by the board at least once in every calendar month, to the county treasurer. On order of the county auditor, the county treasurer shall deposit such revenues in the county treasury to the credit of the revenue fund as designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual in each county treasury for each district in the county issuing bonds under this chapter. Moneys in the designated revenue fund shall be used to pay the costs of operation and maintenance of the projects authorized by this chapter, including refunds authorized by Section 81957, to provide the amounts required for interest and redemption of bonds as provided in this chapter, and for any other purposes authorized by resolution of the board, subject to any restrictions provided by law or the indenture.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 24) and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81963.

For the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter, a fund as designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual shall be established for interest and redemption in each county treasury for each community college district issuing bonds under this chapter. From the money deposited in the designated construction fund of the district, the county treasurer, on order of the county auditor, shall transfer to the designated interest and redemption fund of the district such sums as may be required to pay the interest as it becomes due on all bonds sold and outstanding for the construction or acquisition of a particular project of the district authorized under this chapter during the period of actual construction or acquisition thereof and during such period thereafter as may be provided in the indenture or authorized by resolution of the board. The county treasurer, on order of the county auditor, shall thereafter transfer from the designated revenue fund of the district to the designated interest and redemption fund of the district such sums as may be required to pay the interest on the bonds and redeem the principal thereof as such interest payments and bond redemptions fall due for all bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81964.

Any balance remaining in any of the funds created by this chapter after payment of all costs, expenses, and charges authorized to be expended therefrom, may be allocated and used for such other purposes incidental to the acquisition, construction, furnishing, equipping, operation, and maintenance of such projects authorized under the provisions of this chapter as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81965.

Moneys in the designated construction fund of each district may be invested by the board, subject only to the limitations contained in an indenture providing for the issuance of revenue bonds. All securities or other investments made under the provisions of this chapter shall be held by the county treasurer as custodian thereof. All interest or other earnings received pursuant to such investments shall be collected by the county treasurer, and, on order of the county auditor, shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the fund from which such interest or other earnings are derived.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81966.

After all of the revenue bonds are fully paid and discharged, or provision for their payment and discharge has been irrevocably made, any surplus moneys in the designated construction fund of a district shall, subject to the limitations and restrictions in any indenture providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds, remain available for the acquisition of sites for, and for the construction, equipping, and furnishing of, buildings for community colleges maintained by the district.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 27) and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Supplementary Services [82305.6. - 82322.]



  ARTICLE 1. Transportation [82305.6. - 82305.6.]

82305.6.

When the governing board of a community college district provides for the transportation of students to and from community colleges, the governing board of the district may require the parents and legal guardians of all or some of the students transported, to pay a portion of the cost of the transportation in an amount determined by the governing board. The amount determined by the board shall be no greater than that paid for transportation on a common carrier or municipally owned transit system by other students in the district who do not use the transportation provided by the district. The governing board shall exempt from the charges students of parents and legal guardians who are indigent as set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the board. No charge under this section shall be made for the transportation of students with disabilities. Nothing in this section shall be construed to sanction, perpetuate, or promote the racial or ethnic segregation of students in the community colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Schoolbuses [82321. - 82322.]

82321.

A schoolbus is any motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of any school pupil at or below the 12th-grade level to or from a public or private school or to or from public or private school activities.

The governing board of a district maintaining a community college may, by resolution, designate any motor vehicle operated by or for the district, a schoolbus within the meaning of this section, if it is primarily used for the transportation of community college students to or from a public community college or to or from public community college activities. The designation shall not be effective until written notification thereof has been filed with the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

82322.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 82321, a motor vehicle is not a schoolbus if it is operated for the purpose of transporting any pupil to or from a community college or to or from activities at that college, irrespective of the age of the pupil or the grade level of the pupil, if the pupil is a current enrollee in classes of the college providing the transportation.

(b) A driver of a motor vehicle that meets the criteria established by subdivision (a) shall escort pupils as required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 22112 of the Vehicle Code and shall meet the requirements of Section 12517 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) This section shall apply to a community college district that includes within its boundaries one or more counties, each of which has a population of 250,000 or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 542, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Miscellaneous [82537. - 82548.]



  ARTICLE 2. Use of School Property, Public Purposes [82537. - 82548.]

82537.

(a) There is a civic center at each and every community college within the state
 and the governing board of a community college district may authorize the use, by the community and organizations, of any civic center or other properties under their control, pursuant to this article.

(b) The governing board of any community college district may grant the use of community college facilities or grounds for public, literary, scientific, recreational, educational, or public agency meetings, or for the discussion of matters of general or public interest upon terms and conditions that the governing board deems proper, and subject to the limitations, requirements, and restrictions set forth in this article.

(c) No use shall be granted in a manner that constitutes a monopoly for the benefit of any person or organization.

(d) The use of any community college facility and grounds for any meeting is subject to reasonable rules and regulations as the governing board of the community college district prescribes, and shall not interfere with the use and occupancy of the community college facilities and grounds, as is required for purposes of the community colleges of the state.

(e) The management, direction, and control of the civic center is vested in the governing board of the community college district.

(f) The governing board of the community college district shall make all needful rules and regulations for conducting the civic meetings and for such recreational activities as are provided for in this chapter and that aid, assist, and lend
 encouragement to the activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 66, Sec. 1.   (AB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

82542.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the governing board of a community college district may grant without charge the use of any college facilities or grounds under its control, pursuant to the requirements of this article, when an alternative location is not available, to nonprofit organizations and clubs and associations organized for athletic activities for youth, charitable purposes, educational purposes, or the civic well-being of the community.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the governing board of a community college district may charge an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) The cost of opening and closing the facilities, if no community college employees would otherwise be
 available to perform that function as a part of their normal duties.

(2) The cost of a community college employee’s presence during the organization’s use of the facilities, if the governing board determines that the supervision is needed, and if that employee would not otherwise be present as part of the employee’s normal duties.

(3) The cost of janitorial services, if the services are necessary, and would not have otherwise been performed as part of the janitor’s normal duties.

(4) The cost of utilities directly attributable to the organization’s use of the facilities.

(c) The governing board of a community college district may charge an amount not to exceed its direct costs or not to exceed the fair rental value of college facilities and grounds
 under its control, and pursuant to the requirements of this article, for activities other than those specified in subdivision (a). A governing board that decides to levy these charges shall first adopt a policy specifying which activities shall be charged an amount not to exceed direct costs and which activities shall be charged an amount not to exceed fair rental value.

(d) (1) As used in this section, “direct costs” to the community college district for the use of college facilities or grounds includes all of the following:

(A) The share of the costs of supplies, utilities, janitorial services, services of any other community college district employees, and salaries paid to community college district employees to operate and maintain college facilities or grounds that is proportional to the organization’s use of the college facilities and grounds of the
 community college district pursuant to this section.

(B) The share of the costs for maintenance, repair, restoration, and refurbishment, proportional to the use of the college facilities or grounds by the organization using the college facilities or grounds under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, “college facilities” shall be limited to only nonclassroom space, and “grounds” shall include, but not be limited to, playing fields, athletic fields, track and field venues, tennis courts, and outdoor basketball courts.

(2) The share of the costs for maintenance, repair, restoration, and refurbishment shall not apply to either of the following:

(A) Classroom-based programs that operate after school hours, including, but not limited to, after school programs, tutoring programs, or childcare programs.

(B) Organizations retained by the college or community college district to provide instruction or instructional activities to students during school hours.

(3) Funds collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into a special fund that shall only be used for purposes of this section.

(e) By December 31, 2015, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt, regulations to be used by a governing board of a community college district in determining the proportionate share and the specific allowable costs that a community college district may include as direct costs for the use of its college facilities or grounds.

(f) As used in this section, “fair
 rental value” means the direct costs to the community college district, plus the amortized costs of the college facilities or grounds used for the duration of the activity authorized.

(g) The governing board of a community college district that authorizes the use of college facilities or grounds for the purpose specified in subdivision (h) shall charge the church or religious denomination an amount at least equal to the fair rental value of the facilities or grounds.

(h) The governing board of a community college district may grant the use of college facilities or grounds to any church or religious organization for the conduct of religious services for temporary periods where the church or organization has no suitable meeting place for the conduct of these services upon the terms and conditions as the governing board deems proper, and subject to the limitations, requirements, and
 restrictions set forth in this article. The governing board shall charge the church or religious organization using the property for the conduct of religious services a fee as specified in subdivision (g).

(i) For entertainment or a meeting where an admission fee is charged or a contribution is solicited and the net receipts of the admission fees or contributions are not expended for the welfare of the students of the community college district or for charitable purposes, a charge not less than fair rental value shall be levied for the use of the college facilities, property, and grounds, as determined by the governing board of the community college district.

(j) The governing board of a community college district may permit the use, without charge, by organizations, clubs, or associations organized for youth or senior citizens and for cultural activities.

(k) The governing board of a community college district may grant the use of college facilities, grounds, and equipment to public agencies, including the American Red Cross, for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare, and may cooperate with these agencies in furnishing and maintaining services deemed by the governing board to be necessary to meet the needs of the community.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 66, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   (AB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats 2024, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

82542.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the governing board of a community college district may grant without charge the use of any college facilities or grounds under its control, pursuant to the requirements of this article, when an alternative location is not available, to nonprofit organizations and clubs and associations organized for athletic activities for youth, charitable purposes, educational purposes, or the civic well-being of the community.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the governing board of a community college district may charge an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) The cost of opening and closing the facilities, if no community college employees would otherwise be
 available to perform that function as a part of their normal duties.

(2) The cost of a community college employee’s presence during the organization’s use of the facilities, if the governing board determines that the supervision is needed, and if that employee would not otherwise be present as part of the employee’s normal duties.

(3) The cost of janitorial services, if the services are necessary, and would not have otherwise been performed as part of the janitor’s normal duties.

(4) The cost of utilities directly attributable to the organization’s use of the facilities.

(c) The governing board of a community college district may charge an amount not to exceed its direct costs or not to exceed the fair rental value of college facilities and grounds
 under its control, and pursuant to the requirements of this article, for activities other than those specified in subdivision (a). A governing board that decides to levy these charges shall first adopt a policy specifying which activities shall be charged an amount not to exceed direct costs and which activities shall be charged an amount not to exceed fair rental value.

(1) As used in this section, “direct costs” to the community college district for the use of college facilities or grounds means those costs of supplies, utilities, janitorial services, services of any other community college district employees, and salaries paid community college district employees necessitated by the organization’s use of the college facilities and grounds of the community college district.

(2) As used in this section, “fair rental value” means the direct costs to the community college district,
 plus the amortized costs of the college facilities or grounds used for the duration of the activity authorized.

(d) The governing board of a community college district that authorizes the use of college facilities or grounds for the purpose specified in subdivision (e) shall charge the church or religious denomination an amount at least equal to the fair rental value of the facilities or grounds.

(e) The governing board of a community college district may grant the use of college facilities or grounds to any church or religious organization for the conduct of religious services for temporary periods where the church or organization has no suitable meeting place for the conduct of these services upon the terms and conditions as the governing board deems proper, and subject to the limitations, requirements, and restrictions set forth in this article. The governing board shall charge
 the church or religious organization using the property for the conduct of religious services a fee as specified in subdivision (d).

(f) For entertainment or a meeting where an admission fee is charged or a contribution is solicited and the net receipts of the admission fees or contributions are not expended for the welfare of the students of the community college district or for charitable purposes, a charge shall be made for the use of the college facilities, property, and grounds, which charge shall not be less than the fair rental value for the use of the college facilities, property, and grounds, as determined by the governing board of the community college district.

(g) The governing board of a community college district may permit the use, without charge, by organizations, clubs, or associations organized for youth or senior citizens and for cultural activities.

(h) The governing board of a community college district may grant the use of college facilities, grounds, and equipment to public agencies, including the American Red Cross, for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare, and may cooperate with these agencies in furnishing and maintaining services deemed by the governing board to be necessary to meet the needs of the community.

(i) This section shall be operative on and after January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 66, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 349, Sec. 2.   (AB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

82543.

Notwithstanding any other law, if the governing board of a community college district authorizes the use of any of the community college district’s facilities or grounds pursuant to this article, the community college district shall give priority access to the use of those facilities or grounds to organizations, clubs, and associations, including athletic associations for youth, that serve people from socioeconomically disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 66, Sec. 4.   (AB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

82544.

Lighting, heating, janitor service, and the services of the person when needed, and other necessary expenses, in connection with the use of community college buildings and grounds pursuant to this article, shall be provided for out of the county or special school funds of the respective community college districts in the same manner and by the same authority as similar services are provided for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 278.)
-------------------------------------------

82548.

The governing board of a community college district may require a person, group, or organization granted the use of community college district property pursuant to this article to obtain a certificate of insurance from a liability insurance carrier and to submit that certificate to the district for approval before using district property. The certificate shall evidence a minimum coverage of
 one million dollars ($1,000,000) for liability for injury or damage to property which may arise out of that use of community college district property. The governing board of a community college district may require more than that minimum coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 66, Sec. 5.   (AB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 50. FINANCE [84000. - 85304.]



  CHAPTER 1. State Financial Management and Control [84000. - 84044.]



  ARTICLE 1. Moneys to Districts [84000. - 84001.]

84000.

No assessor, tax collector, city, city and county, or county treasurer shall charge or receive any fees or compensation for assessing, collecting, receiving, keeping, or disbursing any school moneys, but the whole moneys collected shall be paid to the city, city and county, or county treasurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

84001.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the administration of the laws governing the financial support for the California Community Colleges be conducted within the purview of the following principles and policies:

The system of public support for the California Community Colleges should be designed to strengthen and encourage local responsibility for control of community college education. Community college districts should be so organized that they can facilitate the provision of full educational opportunities for all who attend. Local control is best accomplished by the development of strong, vigorous, and properly organized local administrative units. It is the state’s responsibility to create or facilitate the creation of local districts of sufficient size to properly discharge local responsibilities and to spend the tax dollar effectively. 

The system of public support for the California Community Colleges should assure that state, local, and other funds are adequate for the support of a realistic funding level. It is unrealistic and unfair to the less wealthy districts to provide for only a part of the financing necessary for an adequate educational program.

The system of public support should permit and encourage community college districts to provide and support improved district organization and educational programs. The system of public support should prohibit the introduction of undesirable organization and educational practices, and should discourage any such practices now in effect. Improvement of programs in particular districts is in the interests of the state as a whole as well as of the people in individual districts, since the excellence of the programs in some districts will tend to bring about program improvement in other districts. 

The system of public support should make provision for the apportionment of state funds to local districts on a strictly objective basis that can be computed as well by the local districts as by the state. The principle of local responsibility requires that the granting of discretionary powers to state officials over the distribution of state aid and the granting to these officials of the power to impose undue restriction on the use of funds and the conduct of educational programs at the local level be avoided. 

The system of public support for the California Community Colleges should effect a partnership between the state and community college districts, with both participating equitably in accordance with their relative ability. The respective abilities should be combined to provide a financial plan between the state and the districts for public support. 

The system of public support for the California Community Colleges should provide for essential educational opportunities for all who attend. Provision should be made in the financial plan for adequate financing of all educational services. 

The broader based taxing power of the state should be utilized to raise the level of financial support in the properly organized but financially weak districts of the state, thus contributing greatly to the equalization of educational opportunity for the students residing therein. It should also be used to provide a minimum amount of guaranteed support to all districts, for this state assistance serves to develop among all districts a sense of responsibility to the entire system of public education in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 9.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Accounting, Budget Controls and Audits [84030. - 84044.]

84030.

The accounting system including the uniform fund structure used to record the financial affairs of any community college district shall be in accordance with the definitions, instructions, and procedures published in the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual as approved by the board of governors and furnished by the board of governors. No accounting manual so approved shall expressly or by implication affect the content of any educational program or objective, except as otherwise specifically provided for by this code. The Legislature hereby finds that the content shall be best determined by those involved in the administration of educational programs, including community college district governing boards, local administrators, instructors, and students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 634.)
-------------------------------------------

84040.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage sound fiscal management practices among community college districts for the most efficient and effective use of public funds for the education of community college students by strengthening fiscal accountability at the district and state levels.

(b) The governing board of each community college district shall provide for an annual audit of all funds, books, and accounts of the district in accordance with regulations of the board of governors. The audit shall be made by certified public accountants licensed by the California Board of Accountancy. In the event the governing board of a community college district fails to provide for
 an audit, the board of governors shall provide for an audit, and if the board of governors fails or is unable to make satisfactory arrangements for such an audit, the Department of Finance shall make arrangements for the audit. The cost of any audit described above shall be paid from district funds.

(c) The board of governors shall adopt criteria and standards for periodic assessment of the fiscal condition of community college districts, and such regulations regarding the review and improvement of district fiscal conditions as necessary to encourage sound fiscal management practices. In so doing:

(1) The governing board of a community college district, as required by regulations of the board of governors, shall periodically report information to the board of governors regarding the fiscal condition of the district.

(2) The board of governors, by regulation, shall develop standards for district maintenance of sound fiscal conditions. The regulations shall authorize a board comprehensive management review of any community college district which, after assessing itself or being assessed in accordance with board criteria and standards, is shown to be experiencing fiscal difficulty. On the basis of the findings of the management review, the board of governors may recommend appropriate changes in a district’s management practices.

(3) The board of governors, by regulation, shall develop appropriate procedures and actions for districts that fail to achieve fiscal stability or that fail to comply with the board of governors’ recommendations. The procedures and remedies may include the appointment of a special trustee to manage the community college district. The regulations pursuant to which the board of governors may appoint a special trustee to
 manage the community college district shall include specific benchmarks to indicate the presence of local capacity to resume management of the community college district and clear standards that require meaningful consultation by a special trustee, or his or her designee, with the community college district prior to decisionmaking. The board of governors shall be authorized to reduce or withhold apportionment to districts to pay for the cost of the special trustee, management review, or other extraordinary costs resulting from the district’s fiscal difficulties and to ensure the stabilization of the district’s financial condition.

(4) The board of governors shall report to the chairs of the educational policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Director of Finance, and the Governor any corrective action taken by the district and any action taken against the district pursuant to paragraph
 (3).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 2087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84040.3.

Each organization that is described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), and that is recognized by the governing board of a community college district as having a formal relationship with, and that is working on behalf of, the district or a community college within the district, shall file a copy of its audited financial report for the previous fiscal year or its annual financial report for the previous fiscal year with the governing board on or before April 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

84040.5.

(a) The board of governors shall prescribe the statements and other information to be included in the audit reports filed with the state and shall develop audit procedures for carrying out the purposes of this section. The Department of Finance may make audits, surveys, and reports which, in the judgment of the department will serve the best interest of the state.

(b) A review of existing audit procedures, statements, and other information required to be included in the audit reports shall be conducted periodically by the board of governors. Standards shall be updated periodically.

(c) For the audit of community colleges electing to take formal action pursuant
 to Sections 22714 and 87488, the audit standards shall require any information as is prescribed by the chancellor, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The number and type of positions being vacated.

(2) The age and service credit of the retirees receiving the additional service credit provided by Sections 22714 and 87488.
